Alabama, session 2026rs, SB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
61 Section 1. As used in Sections 1 through 5, the
62 following terms have the following meanings:
63 (1) BOARD. The Alabama State Board of Pharmacy.
64 (2) CERTIFIED PHARMACY. A pharmacy that has obtained
65 certification from the board to sell consumable hemp products.
66 (3) CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCT. a. Any product intended to
67 be ingested or absorbed into the body which contains any
68 amount of a nonpsychoactive cannabinoid and includes the
69 following:
70 1. An oral tablet, capsule, or tincture.
71 2. A gummy.
72 3. A gel, oil, cream, or other topical preparation.
73 4. A suppository.
74 b. The term excludes:
75 1. Any product administered by smoking, combustion, or
76 vaping.
77 2. A beverage or food product, such as cookies or
78 candies.
79 3. Raw hemp plant material.
80 4. Any industrial hemp product regulated under Article
81 11 of Chapter 8 of Title 2, Code of Alabama 1975.
82 5. Any medical cannabis product regulated under Chapter
83 2A of Title 20, Code of Alabama 1975.
84 6. Any product approved by the United State Food and
Page 3

6. Any product approved by the United State Food and
SB1 INTRODUCED
85 Drug Administration.
86 (4) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Agriculture and
87 Industries.
88 (5) NONPSYCHOACTIVE CANNABINOID. A nonpsychoactive and
89 naturally occurring cannabinoid compound found in hemp, as
90 defined in Section 2-8-381, Code of Alabama 1975. The term
91 includes, but is not limited to, cannabidiol (CBD) and
92 cannabigerol (CBG). The term excludes any compound
93 synthetically produced from a cannibinoid.
94 (6) PROCESSOR. A person that produces consumable hemp
95 products.
96 Section 2. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, a
97 consumable hemp product may only be sold in the state by a
98 licensed pharmacy that meets the requirements of Sections 1
99 through 5 and only if the product has had a corresponding
100 certificate of analysis issued on its behalf by the
101 department.
102 (b) Any pharmacy that sells consumable hemp products on
103 and after January 1, 2026, must obtain certification on an
104 annual basis from the board, in a form prescribed by the
105 board, by rule. The board may charge a reasonable annual
106 filing fee, established by rule, to cover the costs of
107 administering this section.
108 (c) A certified pharmacy must maintain on its premises
109 the certificate of analysis issued by the department for each
110 consumable hemp product available for sale to the public.
111 (d) The board shall inspect all certified pharmacies no
112 less than annually to determine if the pharmacy meets the
Page 4

less than annually to determine if the pharmacy meets the
SB1 INTRODUCED
113 requirements of this section and rules of the board.
114 (e) The board shall revoke the certification of any
115 pharmacy that violates this section or a rule adopted pursuant
116 to subsection (f) and shall revoke the license of any pharmacy
117 that sells consumable hemp products on or after January 1,
118 2026, without obtaining a certification from the board.
119 (f) The board shall adopt rules as needed to implement
120 this section.
121 Section 3. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, consumable
122 hemp products may only contain nonpsychoactive cannabinoids
123 that are derived from hemp cultivated within the state.
124 (b) The department shall develop, or contract for the
125 development of, and maintain a seed-to-sale hemp tracking
126 system that tracks the cultivation of hemp plants; the
127 processing of nonpsychoactive cannabinboids into consumable
128 hemp products; and the testing of hemp plants and plant
129 material and consumable hemp products.
130 (c) Testing laboratories, hemp cultivators, processors,
131 the board, and the department shall all have the ability to
132 interface with the tracking system as needed, as determined by
133 the department.
134 Section 4. (a) The department, by rule, shall establish
135 protocols for random product testing, which may be conducted
136 during hemp cultivation, processing, and consumable hemp
137 product sales, to ensure consumable hemp products sold in this
138 state are consistently high grade, and maintain a consistency
139 with less than 0.5 percent variability among batches of the
140 same product. In addition, the protocols must provide for
Page 5

same product. In addition, the protocols must provide for
SB1 INTRODUCED
141 testing to allow the department to issue certificates of
142 analysis that correspond to consumable hemp products offered
143 for sale in this state, as further provided in subsection (f).
144 (b) The protocols for testing shall include the
145 following, as well as a determination of corresponding
146 tolerance limits:
147 (1) Cannabinoid content and potency, including, but not
148 limited to, all of the following:
149 a. Total THC (THC+THCA).
150 b. Total CBD (CBD+CBDA).
151 c. THC/CBD ratio, if applicable.
152 d. Percent of THC relative to original plant material
153 (w/w).
154 (2) Terpene profiles.
155 (3) Heavy metals.
156 (4) Chemical contamination, such as residual solvents
157 remaining after extraction and concentration.
158 (5) Microbials, including pathogenic microbials.
159 (6) Mycotoxins.
160 (7) Residual insecticides, fungicides, herbicides, and
161 growth regulators used during cultivation.
162 (c) The department shall collect a random sample of
163 hemp at the premises of a hemp cultivator, a processor, or
164 certified pharmacy for testing. In addition, processors shall
165 submit samples for testing to allow for the department to
166 issue a certificate of analysis prior to a consumable hemp
167 product being offered for sale to the public.
168 (d) The testing laboratory shall be accredited and
Page 6

(d) The testing laboratory shall be accredited and
SB1 INTRODUCED
169 shown to meet the requirements for a testing laboratory in
170 international standard ISO/IEC 17025, with the laboratory's
171 scope of accreditation demonstrating testing capabilities in
172 the categories of cannabinoids, pesticides, toxins, metals,
173 and microbiological bacteria.
174 (e) The testing laboratory shall implement procedures
175 and test methods directly linking the testing results to each
176 applicable source batch, product lot, and sample.
177 (f) The testing laboratory shall submit the test
178 results, through the seed-to-sale hemp tracking system, to be
179 reviewed by the department. The department shall verify
180 whether the test results indicate that the consumable hemp
181 product contains the specific nonpsychoactive cannabinoid
182 listed on a product's label and does not contain more than
183 trace amounts of a pscyhoactive cannabinoid, pesticide, toxin,
184 metal, or microbiological bacteria. If the department verifies
185 that the product meets these specific criteria, the department
186 shall issue a certificate of analysis corresponding to the
187 tested consumable hemp product.
188 (g) Costs associated with testing of hemp plants and
189 plant material shall be borne by the cultivator, and the costs
190 associated with testing of consumable hemp products shall be
191 borne by the processor.
192 Section 5. The department shall adopt rules to
193 implement and enforce Sections 1 through 5.
194 Section 6. Section 20-2-23, Code of Alabama 1975, is
195 amended to read as follows:
196 "§20-2-23
Page 7

"§20-2-23
SB1 INTRODUCED
197 (a) The Legislature finds the following:
198 (1) New synthetic substances are being created which
199 are not controlled under the provisions of existing state law
200 but which have a potential for abuse similar to or greater
201 than that for substances controlled under existing state law.
202 These new synthetic substances are called "synthetic
203 controlled substances or synthetic controlled substance
204 analogues" and can be designed to produce a desired
205 pharmacological effect and to evade the controlling statutory
206 provisions. Synthetic controlled substances or synthetic
207 controlled substance analogues are being manufactured,
208 distributed, possessed, and used as substitutes for controlled
209 substances.
210 (2) The hazards attributable to the traffic in and use
211 of a synthetic controlled substance or synthetic controlled
212 substance analogues are increased because their unregulated
213 manufacture produces variations in purity and concentration.
214 (3) Many new synthetic substances are untested, and it
215 cannot be immediately determined whether they have useful
216 medical or chemical purposes.
217 (4) The uncontrolled importation, manufacture,
218 distribution, possession, or use of controlled substance
219 analogues has a substantial and detrimental impact on the
220 health and safety of the people of this state.
221 (5) Synthetic controlled substances or synthetic
222 controlled substance analogues can be created more rapidly
223 than they can be identified and controlled by action of the
224 Legislature. There is a need for a speedy determination of
Page 8

Legislature. There is a need for a speedy determination of
SB1 INTRODUCED
225 their proper classification under existing law. It is
226 therefore necessary to identify and classify new substances
227 that have a potential for abuse, so that they can be
228 controlled in the same manner as other substances controlled
229 under existing state law.
230 (b) The controlled substances listed in this section
231 are included in Schedule I:
232 (1) Any of the following opiates, including their
233 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters,
234 and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
235 existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is
236 possible within the specific chemical designation:
237 a. Acetylmethadol;
238 b. Allylprodine;
239 c. Alphacetylmethadol;
240 d. Alphameprodine;
241 e. Alphamethadol;
242 f. Benzethidine;
243 g. Betacetylmethadol;
244 h. Betameprodine;
245 i. Betamethadol;
246 j. Betaprodine;
247 k. Clonitazene;
248 l. Dextromoramide;
249 m. Dextrorphan;
250 n. Diampromide;
251 o. Diethylthiambutene;
252 p. Dimenoxadol;
Page 9

p. Dimenoxadol;
SB1 INTRODUCED
253 q. Dimepheptanol;
254 r. Dimethylthiambutene;
255 s. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
256 t. Dipipanone;
257 u. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
258 v. Etonitazene;
259 w. Etoxeridine;
260 x. Furethidine;
261 y. Hydroxypethidine;
262 z. Ketobemidone;
263 aa. Levomoramide;
264 bb. Levophenacylmorphan;
265 cc. Morpheridine;
266 dd. Noracymethadol;
267 ee. Norlevorphanol;
268 ff. Normethadone;
269 gg. Norpipanone;
270 hh. Phenadoxone;
271 ii. Phenampromide;
272 jj. Phenomorphan;
273 kk. Phenoperidine;
274 ll. Piritramide;
275 mm. Proheptazine;
276 nn. Properidine;
277 oo. Racemoramide;
278 pp. Trimeperidine.
279 (2) Any of the following opium derivatives, their
280 salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
Page 10

salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
SB1 INTRODUCED
281 excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and
282 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
283 designation:
284 a. Acetorphine;
285 b. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
286 c. Benzylmorphine;
287 d. Codeine methylbromide;
288 e. Codeine-N-Oxide;
289 f. Cyprenorphine;
290 g. Desomorphine;
291 h. Dihydromorphine;
292 i. Etorphine;
293 j. Heroin;
294 k. Hydromorphinol;
295 l. Methyldesorphine;
296 m. Methyldihydromorphine;
297 n. Morphine methylbromide;
298 o. Morphine methylsulfonate;
299 p. Morphine-N-Oxide;
300 q. Myrophine;
301 r. Nicocodeine;
302 s. Nicomorphine;
303 t. Normorphine;
304 u. Pholcodine;
305 v. Thebacon.
306 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
307 which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
308 substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless
Page 11

substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless
SB1 INTRODUCED
309 specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts,
310 isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
311 chemical designation:
312 a. 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
313 b. 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
314 c. 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
315 d. Bufotenine;
316 e. Diethyltryptamine;
317 f. Dimethyltryptamine;
318 g. 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy amphetamine;
319 h. Ibogaine;
320 i. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
321 j. MarihuanaMarijuana;
322 k. Mescaline;
323 l. Peyote;
324 m. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
325 n. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
326 o. Psilocybin;
327 p. Psilocyn;
328 q. Tetrahydrocannabinols, except for
329 tetrahydrocannabinols nonpsychoactive cannabinoids derived
330 from or found in hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381.
331 (4)a. A synthetic controlled substance that is any
332 material, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity
333 of the following chemical compounds, their salts, isomers, and
334 salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
335 existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
336 possible within the specific chemical designation or compound:
Page 12

possible within the specific chemical designation or compound:
SB1 INTRODUCED
337 1. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone), some
338 trade or other names: 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone.
339 2. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, some other trade
340 names: (MDPV).
341 3. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone), some trade or
342 other names: 4-methylephedrone.
343 4. 4-Methoxymethcathinone (Methedrone), some trade or
344 other names: bk-PMMA.
345 5. 3-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
346 3-FMC.
347 6. 4-Fluoromethcathinone (Flephedrone), some trade or
348 other names: 4-FMC.
349 7.
350 1-[(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(2-iodophenyl)methanone,
351 some trade or other names: AM-694.
352 8.
353 1-[(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone,
354 some trade or other names: AM-2201.
355 9. (6aR, 10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,
356 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[
357 c]chromen-1-ol, some trade or other names: HU-210.
358 10.
359 (6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-y
360 l)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, some trade or
361 other names: HU-211, Dexanabinol.
362 11. 1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
363 or other names: JWH-007.
364 12.
Page 13

12.
SB1 INTRODUCED
365 (2-Methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenylmethanone,
366 some trade or other names: JWH-015.
367 13. Naphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
368 trade or other names: JWH-018.
369 14. 1-Hexyl-3-(naphthalen-1-oyl)indole, some trade or
370 other names: JWH-019.
371 15. Naphthalen-1-yl-(butylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
372 trade or other names: JWH-073.
373 16.
374 4-Methoxynaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
375 trade or other names: JWH-081.
376 17.
377 4-Methoxynaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentyl-2-methylindol-3-yl)
378 methanone, some trade or other names: JWH-098.
379 18.
380 4-Methylnaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
381 trade or other names: JWH-122.
382 19.
383 (1-(2-Morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethanone
384 , some trade or other names: JWH-200.
385 20. 2-(2-Chlorophenyl)-1-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)ethanone,
386 some trade or other names: JWH-203.
387 21.
388 4-Ethylnaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
389 trade or other names: JWH-210.
390 22. 2-(2-Methoxyphenyl)-1-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)ethanone,
391 some trade or other names: JWH-250.
392 23.
Page 14

23.
SB1 INTRODUCED
393 5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-pentylpyrrol-3-yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethano
394 ne, some trade or other names: JWH-307.
395 24. 1-Pentyl-3-(4-Chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
396 or other names: JWH-398.
397 25.
398 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol
399 (Cannabicyclohexanol), some trade or other names: CP 47, 497,
400 and homologues.
401 26.
402 2-(2-Methoxyphenyl)-1-[1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)indol-3-yl]ethanon
403 e, some trade or other names: RCS-8, SR-18.
404 27.
405 2-(4-Methoxyphenyl)-1-(1-pentyl-indol-3-yl)methanone, some
406 trade or other names: RCS-4.
407 28.
408 (R)-(+)-[2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1
409 ,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone, some
410 trade or other names: WIN 55,212-2.
411 29.
412 (4-Methoxyphenyl)-[2-methyl-1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-y
413 l]methanone, some trade or other names: WIN 48,098,
414 Pravadoline.
415 b. In addition to any material, mixture, or preparation
416 that contains any quantity of the chemical compounds listed in
417 paragraph a., a synthetic controlled substance also includes
418 the following chemical compounds, their salts, isomers, and
419 salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
420 existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
Page 15

existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
SB1 INTRODUCED
421 possible within the specific chemical designation or compound:
422 1.
423 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole,
424 some trade or other names: (AM-2233).
425 2. 1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole, some trade or other
426 names: (AB001).
427 3.
428 [1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-indol-3-yl]-1-naphthale
429 nyl-methanone, some trade or other names: (AM1220).
430 4.
431 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyoyl)indole,
432 some trade or other names: (XLR11).
433 5. 1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethycyclopropoyl)indole,
434 some trade or other names: (UR-144).
435 6.
436 6-Methyl-2[(4-methylphenyl)amino]-4H-3,1-benzoxazin-4-one,
437 some trade or other names: (URB 754).
438 7. [1,1'-biphenyl]-3-yl-carbamic acid, cyclohexyl
439 ester, some trade or other names: (URB 602).
440 8.
441 (3'-(Aminocarbonyl)[1,1'-biphenyl]-3-yl)-cyclohexylcarbamate,
442 some trade or other names: (URB597).
443 9. 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole,
444 some trade or other names: (MAM2201).
445 10.
446 1-naphthalenyl[4-(pentyloxy)-naphthalenyl]methanone, some
447 trade or other names: (CB-13).
448 11.
Page 16

11.
SB1 INTRODUCED
449 1-(5-Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole,
450 some trade or other names: (5-Chloro-UR-144).
451 12.
452 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indole-3-
453 carboxamide, some trade or other names: (STS-135).
454 13.
455 1[(N-Methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(adamant-1-oyl)indole,
456 some trade or other names: (AM1248).
457 14. N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some
458 trade or other names: (SDB-001, 2NE1).
459 15.
460 1-Pentyl-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indazole-3-carboxam
461 ide, some trade or other names: (AKB48, APINACA).
462 16. 3-Naphthoylindole.
463 17.
464 1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)i
465 ndole, some trade or other names: (A 796,260).
466 18.
467 1-[(tetrahydropyran-4-ylmethyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(2,2,3,3-tetram
468 ethylcyclopropyl)methanone, some trade or other names: (A
469 834,735).
470 19. 1-(Pent-4-en-1-yl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole,
471 some trade or other names: (JWH-122 4-pentenyl analog).
472 20.
473 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-[(4-fluorophenyl)m
474 ethyl]-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide some trade or other names:
475 (AB-FUBINACA).
476 21.
Page 17

21.
SB1 INTRODUCED
477 [1-(5-bromopentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-tetramethylcycloprop
478 yl)methanone, some trade or other names: (5-Bromo-UR-144)
479 22.
480 5-(1,1-Dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexylphenol,
481 some trade or other names: (CP-47,497 C8 homolog).
482 23.
483 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indazole-
484 3-carboxamide, some trade or other names: (5F-AKB48,
485 5F-APINACA).
486 24. 1-(penta-4-ene)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
487 or other names: (JWH-022).
488 25. 1-(5-Chloropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some
489 trade or other names: (Chloro-AM-2201, JWH-018
490 N-5-chloropentyl analog).
491 26. 1-(5-Hydroxypentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some
492 trade or other names: (Hydroxy-AM-2201).
493 27.
494 N-[(2E)-3-(2-Methoxyethyl)4,5-dimethyl-1,3-thiazole-2(3H)-ylid
495 ene]-2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropane carboxamide, some trade
496 or other names: (A 836,339).
497 28. 1-Pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole, some trade or
498 other names: (AM 679).
499 29. 1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenacetyl)indole, some trade
500 or other names: (JWH-251).
501 30. 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl
502 ester, some trade or other names: (PB-22, QUPIC).
503 31. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid
504 8-quinolinyl ester, some trade or other names: (5F-PB-22).
Page 18

8-quinolinyl ester, some trade or other names: (5F-PB-22).
SB1 INTRODUCED
505 32.
506 1-pentyl-N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some
507 trade or other names: (MN-24, NNE1).
508 33. 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid
509 8-quinolinyl ester, some trade or other names: (BB-22,
510 QUCHIC).
511 34.
512 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-
513 -3-carboxamide, some trade or other names: (AB-PINACA).
514 35.
515 7-methoxy-1-(2-morpholinoethyl)-N-((1S,2S,4R)-1,3,3-trimethylb
516 icyclo[2.2.1]heptan-2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some trade
517 or other names: (MN-25).
518 36. ADB-PINACA.
519 37. FUB-AKB-48.
520 38. FUB-PB-22.
521 39. Heptyl-UR144.
522 40. THJ-018.
523 41. THJ-2201.
524 42. 1-heptyl-3-(1-napthoyl)indole), some trade or other
525 names: (JWH-20).
526 43. Napthalen-1-yl-(1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone,
527 some trade or other names: (JWH-072).
528 44. (6aR,10aR)-3-(1, 1-Dimethylbutyl)-6a, 7, 10,
529 10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran, some
530 trade or other names: (JWH-133).
531 45. 3-(napthalen-1-ylmethyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole, some
532 trade or other names: (JWH-175).
Page 19

trade or other names: (JWH-175).
SB1 INTRODUCED
533 46. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyophenylacetyl)indole, some
534 trade or other names: (JWH-201).
535 47. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole, some
536 trade or other names: (JWH 302).
537 48.
538 [(1R,2R,5R)-2-[2,6-dimethoxy-4-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenyl]-7,7-
539 -dimethyl-4-bicyclo[3.1.1]hept-3-enyl]methanol, some trade or
540 other names: (HU-308).
541 49.
542 3-hydroxy-2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-(1-methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-
543 -1-yl]-5-pentyl-2,5-cyclohexadiene-1,4-dione, some trade or
544 other names: (HU-331).
545 50.
546 N-cyclopropyl-11-(3-hydroxy-5-pentylphenoxy)-undecanamide,
547 some trade or other names: (CB-25).
548 51.
549 N-cyclopropyl-11-(2-hexyl-5-hydroxyphenoxy)-undecanamide, some
550 trade or other names: (CB-52).
551 52.
552 2-[(1R,2R,5R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-5-(2-me
553 thyloctan-2-yl)phenol, some trade or other names:
554 (CB-55,940)(CB-55).
555 53. 4-Methylethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
556 (4-MEC, 4-Methylethcathinone).
557 54. 4'-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
558 trade or other names: (MPPP, ZZ-1).
559 55.
560 (RS)-1-naphthalen-2-yl-2-pyrrolidin-1-ylpentan-1-one, some
Page 20

(RS)-1-naphthalen-2-yl-2-pyrrolidin-1-ylpentan-1-one, some
SB1 INTRODUCED
561 trade or other names: (Naphyrone).
562 56. alpha,alpha-Diphenyl-2-piperidinemethanol, some
563 trade or other names: (Pipradrol, Meratran).
564 57.
565 (RS)-1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(1-pyrrolidinyl)pentan-1-one, some
566 trade or other names: (Pyrovalerone).
567 58. 3,4-Dimethylmethcathinone, some trade or other
568 names: (3,4-DMMC).
569 59. 4-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
570 (4-FA).
571 60. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
572 (4-FMA).
573 61. Butylone, some trade or other names: (bk-MBDB).
574 62. alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone, some trade or other
575 names: (alpha-PVP).
576 63. beta-keto-Dimethylbenzodioxolylbutanamine, some
577 trade or other names: (bk-DMBDB).
578 64. 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylbutan-1-one, some trade or
579 other names: (Buphedrone).
580 65. (RS)-2-ethylamino-1-phenyl-propan-1-one, some trade
581 or other names: (N-Ethylcathinone).
582 66. 2-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
583 (2-FA).
584 67. Methoxetamine, some trade or other names: (MXE).
585 68. 2-Methylamino-1-phenylpentan-1-one, some trade or
586 other names: (Pentedrone).
587 69. 3,4-Methylenedioxycathinone, some trade or other
588 names: (MDC).
Page 21

names: (MDC).
SB1 INTRODUCED
589 70. 2-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
590 (2-FMA).
591 71. 4-methylmethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
592 (4-MMA).
593 72. 4-Fluoroisocathinone, some trade or other names:
594 (4-FIC).
595 73. 3-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
596 (3-FMA).
597 74. Methiopropamine, some trade or other names: (MPA).
598 75. alpha-Pyrrolidinobutiophenone, some trade or other
599 names: (alpha-PBP).
600 76. 4-Methoxy-N-methylcathinone, some trade or other
601 names: (Methedrone, bk-PMMA).
602 77. alpha-Pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some trade or other
603 names: (alpha-PPP).
604 78. (RS)-2-benzhydrylpiperidine, some trade or other
605 names: (Desoxypipradrol).
606 79. 3,4-Methylenedioxyethylcathinone, some trade or
607 other names: (MDEC).
608 80. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone,
609 some trade or other names: (MDPBP).
610 81.
611 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(methylamino)pentan-1-one
612 (Pentylone, bk-MBDP).
613 82. 3-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
614 (3-FA).
615 83. 3-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
616 (3-FMC).
Page 22

(3-FMC).
SB1 INTRODUCED
617 84. 2-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
618 (2-FMC).
619 85.
620 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(dimethylamino)propan-1-one
621 (bk-MDDMA).
622 86. N,N-Diethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
623 (Amfepramone, DEC).
624 87. 1,3-Dimethylamylamine, some trade or other names:
625 (DMAA).
626 88. N, N-Dimethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
627 (DMC).
628 89. N-Ethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone, some trade or
629 other names: (bk-MDEA).
630 90. N-Ethylamphetamine, some trade or other names:
631 (EMA).
632 91. N-Ethylcathinone, some trade or other names: (EC).
633 92. 2-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
634 (2-EEC).
635 93. 4-Ethyl-N-ethylcathinone, some trade or other
636 names: (4-EEC).
637 94.
638 2-(5-Methoxy-1-benzofuran-3-yl)-N,N-dimethylethanamine, some
639 trade or other names: (Dimembfe).
640 95. 2-(5-Methoxy-1-benzofuran-3-yl)N-ethylethamine.
641 96. 4-Methoxymethamphetamine, some trade or other
642 names: (PMMA).
643 97. 4-Methoxy-N-ethylamphetamine, some trade or other
644 names: (PMEA).
Page 23

names: (PMEA).
SB1 INTRODUCED
645 98. 4-Methoxy-N-ethylcathinone, some trade or other
646 names: (ETHEDRONE).
647 99. 3-Methylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
648 (3-MMC).
649 100. 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, some trade
650 or other names: (MPBP).
651 101. 2-Methylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
652 (2-MEC).
653 102. 3-Methylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
654 (3-MEC).
655 103. 2-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
656 (2-EEC).
657 104. 3-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
658 (3-EEC).
659 105. 3-Ethylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
660 (3-EMC).
661 106.
662 3',4'-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
663 trade or other names: (MDPPP).
664 107. alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiothiophenone, some trade or
665 other names: (alpha-PVT).
666 108. 3-Methoxymethcathinone, some trade or other names:
667 (3-MeOMC).
668 109. N-Methyl-1,3-benzodioxolylbutanamine, some trade
669 or other names: (MBDB).
670 110. Ethcathinone, some trade or other names:
671 (ETHYLPROPION, ETH-CAT).
672 111. Ethylone (3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone).
Page 24

111. Ethylone (3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone).
SB1 INTRODUCED
673 112. N-N-Diethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
674 113. 3,4-methylenedioxy-propiophenone.
675 114. 2-Bromo-3,4-methylenedioxypropiophenone.
676 115. 3,4-methylenedioxy-propiophenone-2-oxime.
677 116. N-Acetyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
678 117. N-Acetyl-N-Methyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
679 118. N-Acetyl-N-Ethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
680 119. 4-Bromomethcathinone.
681 120. 3-Bromomethcathinone.
682 121. Eutylone (beta-Keto-Ethylbenzodioxolylbutanamine).
683 122. 4'-Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
684 trade or other names: (MOPPP).
685 123. 4'-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, some
686 trade or other names: (MPHP).
687 124. Benocyclidine (BCP) or
688 Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine, some trade or other
689 names: (BTCP).
690 125. 4-Fluoro-(methylamino)butyrophenone, some trade or
691 other names: (F-MABP).
692 126. 3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethacathinone, some trade or
693 other names: (3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT).
694 127. 4-Methyl-(ethylamino)-butryophenone, some trade or
695 other names: (Me-EABP).
696 128. 4-Ethyl-methcathinone, some trade or other names:
697 (4-EMC).
698 129. 4-methoxy-N-ethylcathinone
699 (bk-PMC;p-methox-ethcathinone).
700 130. 4'-Methoxy-alpha-pyrroldino-propiophenone (MeOPPP;
Page 25

130. 4'-Methoxy-alpha-pyrroldino-propiophenone (MeOPPP;
SB1 INTRODUCED
701 4'-MeO-PPP).
702 131. 3-Fluorocathinone (3-FC).
703 132. 4-Fluorocathinone (4-FC).
704 133. 4-methyl-buphedrone (4-MeMABP; 4MeBP; BZ-6378).
705 134. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-benzylcathinone, some trade
706 or other names: (BMDP).
707 135. N-Benzyl-butylone, some trade or other names:
708 (BMDB).
709 136. N-Hydroxy-3,4-methlyenedioxymethcathinone.
710 137. N-ethylbuphedrone, some trade or other names:
711 (NEB).
712 138. 4-Fluorobuphedrone, some trade or other names:
713 (4-FBP).
714 139. 4-Methoxy-pyrrolidinbutrophenone (4-MeO-PBP).
715 140. 4-Ethyl-pyrrolidinobutrophenone, some trade or
716 other names: (4-Et-PBP).
717 141. 5-(2-aminopropyl)indole, some trade or other
718 names: (5-IT).
719 142. 1-phenyl-2-(piperidin-1-yl)butan-1-one.
720 143. 2,4,5-Trimethyl-methacathinone, some trade or
721 other names: (2,4,5-TMMC).
722 144. alpha-pyrrolidino-heptiophenone, some trade or
723 other names: (alpha-PHpP).
724 145. 4-Methylamphetamine (4-MA: pTAP; PAL-313; 4-MeA;
725 PmeA).
726 146. N-Ethyl-methamphetamine.
727 147. 4-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
728 names: (4-APB).
Page 26

names: (4-APB).
SB1 INTRODUCED
729 148. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydro-1H-indene (5-APDI;
730 IAP; AIP; indanylaminoporpane).
731 149. 6,7-Methylenedioxy-2-aminotetralin, some trade or
732 other names: (MDAT).
733 150. 4-Methylthioamphetamine (4-MTA; P1882).
734 151. 4-Chloroamphetamine (p-chloro-amphetamine).
735 152. 2,4,6-Trimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other
736 names: (TMA-6).
737 153. 2,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other
738 names: (TMA-2).
739 154. 2,5-Dimethylamphetamine, some trade or other
740 names: (2,5-DMA).
741 155. 3,4-Dimethylamphetamine, some trade or other
742 names: (3,4-DMA).
743 156. N-propylamphetamine.
744 157. 4-Hydroxyamphetamine.
745 158. 3-Hydroxyamphetamine.
746 159. Methylenedioxydimethylamphetamine, some trade or
747 other names: (MDDM).
748 160. 2-Aminoindane, some trade or other names: (2-AI).
749 161. 5,6-Methylenedioxy-N-methyl-aminoindane, some
750 trade or other names: (MDMAI).
751 162. 2C-T-21.
752 163. 2C-B-Fly.
753 164. 3,4-dimethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (2C-G).
754 165. 25D-NBOMe.
755 166. 25G-NBOMe.
756 167. 25N-NBOMe.
Page 27

167. 25N-NBOMe.
SB1 INTRODUCED
757 168. Bromo-benzyldifuranyl-isopropylamine, some trade
758 or other names: (Bromo Dragon Fly).
759 169. 3C-B fly.
760 170. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylthioamphetamine, some trade
761 or other names: (Aleph-2).
762 171. 1-[(4-ethoxy-2,5-dimethoxy)phenyl]propan-2-amine,
763 some trade or other names: (MEM).
764 172.
765 1-[2,5-dimethoxy-4-(propylthio)phenyl]propan-2-amine, some
766 trade or other names: (Aleph-7).
767 173. N-benzyl-2-phenylethylanamine.
768 174. N,N-dimethyl-2-phenylethanamine.
769 175. 6-chloro-2-aminotetralin, some trade or other
770 names: (6-CAT).
771 176. 2-phenylpropan-1-amine, some trade or other names:
772 (B-Me-PEA).
773 177. 2-Phenethylamine, some trade or other names:
774 (2-PEA).
775 178. 1-methylamino-1-(3,4-methylenedioxyphenyl)propane,
776 some trade or other names: (M-ALPHA).
777 179. Camfetamine.
778 180. Methoxyphenamine.
779 181. 4-methylaminorex, some trade or other names:
780 (4-MAR; 4-MAX; U4Euh; Euphoria; Ice).
781 182. (1-thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine
782 (Thienoamphetamine).
783 183. Dimethocaine.
784 184. 4-Fluoroephedrine.
Page 28

184. 4-Fluoroephedrine.
SB1 INTRODUCED
785 185. 4-methyaminorex (p-methyl derivative).
786 186.
787 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-2-methyl-3-(naphthalen-1-oy
788 l)-6-nitroindole (AM1221).
789 187. (1-butyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(4-methoxyphenyl)-methanone
790 (RCS-4 (C4) homolog).
791 188. 5-[3-(1-naphthoyl)-1H-indole-1-yl]pentanenitrile,
792 some trade or other names: (AM2232).
793 189. 1-(Pentyl)-3-(4-bromo-1-naphthoyl)-indole, some
794 trade or other names: (JWH-387).
795 190. 1-(Pentyl)-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)-indole, some
796 trade or other names: (JWH-412).
797 191. 1-(5-chlorpentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole, some
798 trade or other names: (AM694 Derivative).
799 192.
800 (2-iodo-5-nitrophenyl)-[1-[(1-methylpiperidin-2-yl]methyl]1H-i
801 ndol-3-yl]-methanone, some trade or other names: (AM1241).
802 193. 1-Pentyl-3-[1-(4-propyl)naphthoyl]indole, some
803 trade or other names: (JWH-182).
804 194. JWH-081 2-methoxynaphthyl isomer, some trade or
805 other names: (JWH-267).
806 195.
807 (3-methoxyphenyl)(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone, some trade
808 or other names: (RCS-4 3-methoxy isomer).
809 196.
810 [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](4-ethyl-1-naphthalenyl)-met
811 hanone (EAM-2201).
812 197. ADB-FUBINACA.
Page 29

197. ADB-FUBINACA.
SB1 INTRODUCED
813 198. ADBICA.
814 199. AM-279.
815 200. JWH-370.
816 201. NNE-1.
817 202. MAM-2201 chloropentyl derivative.
818 203. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-methyl-benzoyl)indole.
819 204. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-ethylbenzoyl)indole.
820 205. AB-005.
821 206. AB-005 Azepane isomer.
822 207.
823 4-hydroxy-3,3,4-trimethyl-1-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)pentan-1-o
824 ne (4-HTMPIPO).
825 208. UR-12.
826 209. 5-Fluoro-ADBICA.
827 210. BAY-38-7271; KN 38-7271.
828 211. JTE-907.
829 212. Org 27569.
830 213. Org 27759.
831 214. Org 29647.
832 215. LY 2183240.
833 216. JTE 7-31.
834 217. URB 937.
835 218. 3-methoxy-eticyclidine, some trade or other names:
836 (3-MeO-PCE).
837 219. 1-Phenylcyclohexanamine, some trade or other
838 names: (PCA).
839 220. 4-Methyl-phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
840 (4-Me-PCP).
Page 30

(4-Me-PCP).
SB1 INTRODUCED
841 221. 4-Methoxy-eticyclidine, some trade or other names:
842 (4-MeO-PCE).
843 222. 4-Methoxyphencyclidine, some trade or other names:
844 (Methoxydine; 4MeO-PCP).
845 223. 3-Methoxyphencyclidine, some trade or other names:
846 (3-MeO-PCP).
847 224. 1-phenyl-N-propylcyclohexanamine, some trade or
848 other names: (PCPr).
849 225. N-(2-methoxyethyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
850 trade or other names: (PCMEA).
851 226. N-(2-ethoxyethyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
852 trade or other names: (PCEEA).
853 227. N-(3-methoxypropyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
854 trade or other names: (PCMPA).
855 228. 3-Hydroxy-phencyclidine, some trade or other
856 names: (3-OH-PCP).
857 229. Methoxyketamine, some trade or other names:
858 (2-MeO-2-deschloro-ketamine).
859 230. Tiletamine, some trade or other names: (TCE).
860 231. N-ethylnorketamine.
861 232. N-Methyltryptamine, some trade or other names:
862 (NMT).
863 233. N-Methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some trade or
864 other names: (MiPT; MIPT).
865 234. 4-hydroxy-N,N-methylisopropyltryptamine, some
866 trade or other names: (4-OH-MiPT).
867 235. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyl-tryptamine (4-AcO-DiPT:
868 4-AcO-DIPT; 4-Acetoxy-MiPT).
Page 31

4-AcO-DIPT; 4-Acetoxy-MiPT).
SB1 INTRODUCED
869 236. 4-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
870 other names: (4-MeO-DMT).
871 237. 5-Hydroxytryptamine, some trade or other names:
872 (5-HT).
873 238. 5-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
874 other names: (5-AcO-DMT).
875 239. 5-Methoxy-N,N-dipropyltryptamine, some trade or
876 other names: (5-MeO-DPT).
877 240. d-Lysergic acid amide, some trade or other names:
878 (LSA; ergine).
879 241. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine, some trade or
880 other names: (DOC).
881 242.
882 N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, some
883 trade or other names: (25I-NBOMe).
884 243. 4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, some trade or
885 other names: (2C-E).
886 244. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine, some trade or
887 other names: (2C-I).
888 245. 6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, some
889 trade or other names: (6-APDB).
890 246. 6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
891 names: (6-APB).
892 247. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, some
893 trade or other names: (5-APDB).
894 248. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
895 names: (5-APB).
896 249. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine, some
Page 32

249. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine, some
SB1 INTRODUCED
897 trade or other names: (2C-T-7).
898 250. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine, some
899 trade or other names: (2C-P).
900 251. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromoamphetamine, some trade or
901 other names: (DOB).
902 252. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromobenzylpiperazine, some trade
903 or other names: (2C-B-BZP).
904 253. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine, some trade or
905 other names: (2C-B).
906 254. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine, some trade
907 or other names: (2C-C).
908 255. 2,5-Dimethoxy-(4-ethylthio)phenethylamine, some
909 trade or other names: (2C-T-2).
910 256. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine, some trade or
911 other names: (DOI).
912 257. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylamphetamine, some trade or
913 other names: (DOM).
914 258. 2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine, some trade or other
915 names: (2C-H).
916 259.
917 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-bromo)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
918 some trade or other names: (25B-NBOMe).
919 260.
920 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-chloro)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine
921 , some trade or other names: (25C-NBOMe).
922 261.
923 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-ethyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
924 some trade or other names: (25E-NBOMe).
Page 33

some trade or other names: (25E-NBOMe).
SB1 INTRODUCED
925 262. 2-Ethylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
926 (2-EMC).
927 263.
928 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, some
929 trade or other names: (25H-NBOMe).
930 264. BZP (Benzylpiperazine).
931 265. para-Fluorophenylpiperazine.
932 266. 1-(4-Methylphenyl)piperazine.
933 267. meta-Cholorophenylpiperazine.
934 268. para-Methoxyphenylpiperazine.
935 269. DBZP (1,4-dibenzylpiperazine).
936 270. TFMPP (3-Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine).
937 271. 2C-T-4
938 (2,5-Dimethoxy-4-isopropylthiophenethylamine.
939 272. 2C-T (2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylthiophenethylamine).
940 273. 2C-D (2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine).
941 274. 2C-N 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine.
942 275. 5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine, some trade or
943 other names: (5-MeO-DALT).
944 276. 5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or
945 other names: (5-MeO-DIPT).
946 277. 5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine, some trade or
947 other names: (5-MeO-AMT).
948 278. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
949 other names: (4-AcO-DMT).
950 279. 4-Hydroxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
951 other names: (4-HO-DET).
952 280. 4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or
Page 34

280. 4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or
SB1 INTRODUCED
953 other names: (4-HO-DIPT).
954 281. 4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine, some trade
955 or other names: (4-OH-MET).
956 282. 5-Methoxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
957 other names: (5-MeO-DET).
958 283. 5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
959 trade or other names: (5-MeO-MIPT).
960 284. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
961 other names: (4-AcO-DET).
962 285. 4-Acetoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
963 trade or other names: (4-AcO-MIPT).
964 286. N,N-Dipropyltryptamine, some trade or other names:
965 (DPT).
966 287. N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or other
967 names: (DIPT).
968 288. 4-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
969 trade or other names: (4-MeO-MIPT).
970 289. Tyramine (4-Hydroxyphenethylamine).
971 290. 5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine.
972 291. 5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine.
973 292. 5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine.
974 293. 5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine.
975 294. Diphenylprolinol, some trade or other names:
976 (D2PM; diphenyl-2-pyrrolidinemethanol).
977 295. 3,4 Dichloromethylphenidate, some trade or other
978 names: (3,4-CTMP).
979 296. 3-chloromethyl-phenidate, some trade or other
980 names: (3-CTMP).
Page 35

names: (3-CTMP).
SB1 INTRODUCED
981 297. 4-Methylmethylphenidate.
982 298. 4-Fluoromethyl-phenidate, some trade or other
983 names: (4-FTMP).
984 299. Ethylphenidate.
985 300. Etizolam (Etilaam, Etizola, Sedekopan, Pasaden,
986 Depas).
987 301. Phenazepam.
988 302. Pyrazolam.
989 303. CL-218,872.
990 304. Zopiclone.
991 305. Salvinorin A.
992 306. AH-7921.
993 307. O-Desmethyltramadol, some trade or other names:
994 (O-DT; ODT).
995 308. Desmorphine (Dihydrodesoxymorphine; permonid;
996 krokodil; crocodile).
997 309. Acetyl Fentanyl (desmethylfentanyl).
998 310. 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine
999 (MT-45).
1000 311. 1-(2-methoxyphenyl)piperazine, some trade or other
1001 names: (MOPIP).
1002 312. 1-(4-Chlorophenyl)piperazine, some trade or other
1003 names: (pCPP).
1004 313. para-Methoxyphenyl-piperazine, some trade or other
1005 names: (MBZP).
1006 314. Methylmethaqualone.
1007 315. Etaqualone.
1008 316. 5-Iodo-2-aminoindane, some trade or other names:
Page 36

316. 5-Iodo-2-aminoindane, some trade or other names:
SB1 INTRODUCED
1009 (5-IAI).
1010 317. 5,6-(Methylenedioxy)-2-aminoindane, some trade or
1011 other names: (5,6-MDAI).
1012 318. 4,5-(Methylenedioxy)-2-aminoindane, some trade or
1013 other names: (4,5-MDAI).
1014 319. MMAI.
1015 320. W-15.
1016 321. W-18.
1017 322. Mitragynine.
1018 323. Hydroxymitragynine.
1019 324. Butyrfentanyl
1020 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-pyridinyl]butyramide).
1021 325. Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl
1022 (N-phenyl-N-{1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperdinyl}-pr
1023 opanamide).
1024 326. 4-methylphenethyl acetyl fentanyl
1025 (N-phenyl-N-{1-[2-(4-methylphenyl)ethyl]-4-piperdinyl}-acetami
1026 de).
1027 327. Acrylfentanyl
1028 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-prop-2-enamide).
1029 328. 3-Allylfentanyl
1030 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-(3s,4R)-3-prop-2-enyl-4-piperid
1031 inyl]-propanamide).
1032 329. Benzodioxole fentanyl
1033 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-benzo[d][1,3]dio
1034 xole-5-carboxamide).
1035 330. Benzyl carfentanil
1036 (N-phenyl-N-(1-benzyl-4-methylcarboxylate-4-piperidinyl)-propa
Page 37

(N-phenyl-N-(1-benzyl-4-methylcarboxylate-4-piperidinyl)-propa
SB1 INTRODUCED
1037 namide).
1038 331. Brifentanil
1039 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-{(3R,4S)-1-[2-(4-ethyl-5-oxotetrazol-1-y
1040 l)ethyl]-3-methyl-4-piperdinyl}-2-methoxyacetamide).
1041 332. Cyclopentylfentanyl
1042 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-cyclopentanecarb
1043 oxamide).
1044 333. 2,5-Dimethylfentanyl
1045 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-2,5-dimethyl-4-piperidinyl]-pro
1046 pranamide).
1047 334. 4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl
1048 (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-isobut
1049 yramide).
1050 335. Furanyl fentanyl
1051 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]furan-2-carboxami
1052 de).
1053 336. Furanylethyl fentanyl
1054 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-furanylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide).
1055 337. Isobutyryl fentanyl
1056 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-2-methylpropanami
1057 de).
1058 338. Lofentanil
1059 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-(3R,4S)-3-methyl-4-methylcarbox
1060 ylate-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide).
1061 339. 4-Methoxybutyrfentanyl
1062 (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyr
1063 amide).
1064 340. 4-Methoxymethylfentanyl
Page 38

340. 4-Methoxymethylfentanyl
SB1 INTRODUCED
1065 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-methoxymethyl-4-piperidinyl]-
1066 propanamide).
1067 341. Meta-fluorobutyryl fentanyl
1068 (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-butyram
1069 ide).
1070 342. Meta-fluorofentanyl
1071 (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-propana
1072 mide).
1073 343. 3-Methylbutyrfentanyl
1074 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyramide).
1075 344. N-Methylcarfentanyl
1076 (N-phenyl-N-(1-methyl-4-methylcarboxylate-4-piperidinyl)-propa
1077 namide).
1078 345. Methoxyacetylfentanyl
1079 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-methoxyacetami
1080 de).
1081 346. Mirfentanyl
1082 (N-(2-pyrazinyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-furamid
1083 e).
1084 347. Ocfentanil
1085 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-2-metho
1086 xyacetamide).
1087 348. Ohmefentanyl
1088 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidiny
1089 l]-propanamide).
1090 349. Ortho-fluorobutyryl fentanyl
1091 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-butyram
1092 ide).
Page 39

ide).
SB1 INTRODUCED
1093 350. Ortho-fluorofentanyl
1094 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-propana
1095 mide).
1096 351. Para-chlorofentanyl
1097 (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
1098 amide).
1099 352. Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl
1100 (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-isobut
1101 yramide).
1102 353. 4-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl
1103 (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyra
1104 mide).
1105 354. Para-methoxyfentanyl
1106 (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propa
1107 namide).
1108 355. Para-methylfentanyl
1109 (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
1110 amide).
1111 356. 4-Phenyl fentanyl
1112 (N-phenyl-N-[4-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propana
1113 mide).
1114 357. Trefentanyl
1115 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-{1-[2-(4-ethyl-5-oxo-4,5-dihydro-1H-tetr
1116 azol-1-yl)ethyl]-4-phenyl-4-piperdinyl}-propanamide).
1117 358. Valeryl fentanyl
1118 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-pentanamide).
1119 359. Alpha-Methylacetylfentanyl
1120 (N-phenyl-N-[1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide).
Page 40

(N-phenyl-N-[1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide).
SB1 INTRODUCED
1121 360. Alpha-Methylbutyrfentanyl
1122 (N-phenyl-N-[1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyramide).
1123 361. Alpha-Methylthiofentanyl
1124 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(1-thienyl-2-ylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-prop
1125 anamide).
1126 362. Beta-Hydroxy fentanyl
1127 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
1128 amide).
1129 363. Beta-Methyl fentanyl
1130 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylpropyl)-4-piperdinyl]-propanamide).
1131 364. U-47700
1132 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[(1R,2R)-2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl
1133 benzamide).
1134 365. W-19
1135 ((Z)-N-{1-[2-(4-aminophenyl)ethyl]piperidin-2-ylidene}-4-chlor
1136 obenzenesulfonamide).
1137 366. Flubromazolam
1138 (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a]
1139 [1,4]benzodiazepine).
1140 367. Tianeptine.
1141 (5)a. A synthetic controlled substance analogue, being
1142 a material, mixture, or preparation that contains any chemical
1143 structure of which is chemically similar to the chemical
1144 structure of any other controlled substance in Schedule I or
1145 Schedule II or that satisfies any one of the following:
1146 1. Has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic
1147 effect on the central nervous system that mimics or is similar
1148 to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or
Page 41

to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or
SB1 INTRODUCED
1149 hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
1150 controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II.
1151 2. With respect to a particular person, if the person
1152 represents or intends that the substance have a stimulant,
1153 depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
1154 system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
1155 stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central
1156 nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or
1157 Schedule II and the substance is actually capable of producing
1158 a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
1159 central nervous system that mimics, is similar to, or is
1160 greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic
1161 effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
1162 in Schedule I or Schedule II.
1163 3. Has been demonstrated to have binding activity at
1164 one or more cannabinoid receptors.
1165 4. Is capable of exhibiting cannabinoid-like activity.
1166 5. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1167 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or
1168 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the
1169 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1170 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1171 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1172 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1173 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1174 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1175 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1176 6. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
Page 42

6. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
SB1 INTRODUCED
1177 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the
1178 nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1179 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1180 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1181 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1182 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted
1183 in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1184 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1185 7. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1186 or derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at
1187 the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1188 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1189 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1190 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1191 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1192 in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1193 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1194 8. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1195 or derived from 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the
1196 nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, alkyl halide,
1197 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1198 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1199 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1200 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted
1201 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1202 in the phenyl ring to any extent.
1203 9. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1204 or derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution
Page 43

or derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution
SB1 INTRODUCED
1205 at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1206 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1207 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1208 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1209 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in the
1210 cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
1211 10. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1212 or derived from 3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole or
1213 1H-indol-3-yl-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)methane by
1214 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
1215 alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl,
1216 aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1217 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1218 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1219 in the indole ring to any extent.
1220 11. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1221 or derived from 3-(adamant-1-oyl)indole or
1222 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-adamantyl)methane by substitution at the
1223 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1224 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1225 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1226 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1227 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1228 in the indole ring to any extent.
1229 12. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1230 or derived from N-(1-naphthalenyl)indole-3-carboxyamide or
1231 1H-indol-(N-naphthyl)-3-carboxamide by substitution at the
1232 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
Page 44

nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
SB1 INTRODUCED
1233 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1234 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1235 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1236 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1237 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1238 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1239 13. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1240 or derived from N-(adamantan-1yl)indole-3-carboxyamide or
1241 1H-indol-3-carboxamide-(1-adamantyl) by substitution at the
1242 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1243 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1244 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1245 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1246 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1247 in the indole ring to any extent.
1248 14. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1249 or derived from N-(adamantan-1yl)indazole-3-carboxyamide or
1250 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide-(1-adamantyl) by substitution at the
1251 nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1252 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1253 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1254 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1255 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1256 in the indazole ring to any extent.
1257 15. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1258 or derived from
1259 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropoyl]indazole-3-carboxyam
1260 ide or
Page 45

ide or
SB1 INTRODUCED
1261 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide-N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpr
1262 opoyl] by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indazole
1263 ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide,
1264 alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1265 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1266 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1267 in the indazole ring to any extent.
1268 16. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1269 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole or
1270 1H-indazole-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the
1271 nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1272 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1273 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1274 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1275 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1276 in the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1277 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1278 17. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1279 or derived from 3-(carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester)indole
1280 or 1H-indol-3-carboxylic acid-(8-quinolinyl)ester by
1281 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
1282 alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl,
1283 aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1284 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1285 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1286 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1287 in the quinoline ring to any extent.
1288 18. Any compound structurally related to
Page 46

18. Any compound structurally related to
SB1 INTRODUCED
1289 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine by substitution of
1290 the iodo moiety (4 position) with other halides, alkyl, alkyl
1291 halides, thioalkyl, cycloalkyl, cycloalkylhalides and/or
1292 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the ethanamine with
1293 alkyl, alkyl halide, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
1294 cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl whether or not further
1295 substituted in the (either) phenyl ring to any extent.
1296 19. Any compound structurally related to
1297 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine by substitution of the
1298 chloro moiety (4 position) with other halides, alkyl, alkyl
1299 halides, thioalkyl, cycloalkyl, cycloalkylhalides and/or
1300 substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl, alkyl halide,
1301 alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl
1302 whether or not further substituted in the (either) phenyl ring
1303 to any extent.
1304 20. Any compound structurally related to
1305 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone (cathinone) by substitution of
1306 the amine with alkyl, alkyl halide, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
1307 cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl whether or not further
1308 substituted in the (either) phenyl ring to any extent.
1309 21. Any compound structurally related to
1310 a-pyrrolidinopentiophenone (a-pvp) whether or not further
1311 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent, whether or not
1312 further substituted in the pyrrolidine ring to any extent.
1313 b. A synthetic controlled substance or analogue in
1314 subdivision (4) or this subdivision does not include any of
1315 the following:
1316 1. Any substance for which there is an approved new
Page 47

1. Any substance for which there is an approved new
SB1 INTRODUCED
1317 drug application under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
1318 Act.
1319 2. With respect to a particular person, any substance,
1320 if an exemption is in effect for investigational use, for that
1321 person, as provided by 21 U.S.C. § 355, and the person is
1322 registered as a controlled substance researcher as required
1323 under sectionSection 152.12, subdivisionSubdivision 3, to the
1324 extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to
1325 the exemption and registration.
1326 c. A controlled substance analogue is treated as a
1327 controlled substance in Schedule I.
1328 d. After the Alabama Department of Forensic Sciences
1329 has determined a substance to be a synthetic controlled
1330 substance analogue under this section, the department shall
1331 notify the Alabama Department of Public Health with
1332 information relevant to scheduling as provided by Section
1333 20-2-20."
1334 Section 7. Section 1 of Act 2025-385 of the 2025
1335 Regular Session, which adds Chapter 12 to Title 28 of the Code
1336 of Alabama 1975, establishes certain restrictions on the
1337 distribution and sale of consumable hemp products, and
1338 requires the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to
1339 license retailers of consumable hemp products, is repealed.
1340 Section 8. This act shall become effective on July 1,
1341 2026.
Page 48